District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.17

Additional penalty for driving under the influence of alcohol or a drug; commercial vehicle.

A person violating any provision of § 50-2206.12 shall, in addition to any applicable penalty under section § 50-2206.13, be subject to an additional 5 day mandatory-minimum term of incarceration.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3h
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).